Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1439
Dealer, manufacturer, distributor; liability for damages to motor vehicles.

(1) The new motor vehicle dealer shall be solely liable for damages to new motor vehicles after acceptance from the carrier and before delivery to the ultimate purchaser. A delivery receipt signed by a new motor vehicle dealer shall be evidence of such dealer's acceptance of any new motor vehicles.

(2) The manufacturer or distributor shall be liable for all damages to motor vehicles before delivery to a carrier or transporter and while such vehicles are on the carrier or transporter, except that if the new motor vehicle dealer selected the method and mode of transportation and the carrier or transporter, then such dealer shall be liable for damages to any new motor vehicles after delivery to the carrier or transporter.

Laws 1984, LB 825, § 22.